Oklahoma, session 2026, SB252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 395, O.S.L.


2022, as amended by Section 2, Chapter 448, O.S.L. 2024 (56 O.S.


Supp. 2024, Section 4002.3a), is amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 723 Page 1


Section 4002.3a. A. 1. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority


(OHCA) shall enter into capitated contracts with contracted entities


for the delivery of Medicaid services as specified in the Ensuring


Access to Medicaid Act to transform the delivery system of the state


Medicaid program for the Medicaid populations listed in this


section.


2. Unless expressly authorized by the Legislature, the


Authority shall not issue any request for proposals or enter into


any contract to transform the delivery system for the aged, blind,


and disabled populations eligible for SoonerCare.


B. 1. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall issue a request


for proposals to enter into public-private partnerships with


contracted entities other than dental benefit managers to cover all


Medicaid services other than dental services and prescription drug


services for the following Medicaid populations:


a. pregnant women,


b. children,


c. deemed newborns under 42 C.F.R., Section 435.117,


d. parents and caretaker relatives, and


e. the expansion population.


2. The Authority shall specify the services to be covered in


the request for proposals referenced in paragraph 1 of this


subsection. Capitated contracts referenced in this subsection shall



Req. No. 723 Page 2


cover all Medicaid services other than dental services and


prescription drug services including:


a. physical health services including, but not limited


to:


(1) primary care,


(2) inpatient and outpatient services, and


(3) emergency room services, and


b. behavioral health services, and


c. prescription drug services.


3. The Authority shall specify the services not covered in the


request for proposals referenced in paragraph 1 of this subsection.


4. Subject to the requirements and approval of the Centers for


Medicare and Medicaid Services, the implementation of the program


shall be no later than April 1, 2024.


C. 1. The Authority shall issue a request for proposals to


enter into public-private partnerships with dental benefit managers


to cover dental services for the following Medicaid populations:


a. pregnant women,


b. children,


c. parents and caretaker relatives,


d. the expansion population, and


e. members of the Children’s Specialty Plan as provided


by subsection D of this section.



Req. No. 723 Page 3


2. The Authority shall specify the services to be covered in


the request for proposals referenced in paragraph 1 of this


subsection.


3. Subject to the requirements and approval of the Centers for


Medicare and Medicaid Services, the implementation of the program


shall be no later than April 1, 2024.


D. 1. Either as part of the request for proposals referenced


in subsection B of this section or as a separate request for


proposals, the Authority shall issue a request for proposals to


enter into public-private partnerships with one contracted entity to


administer a Children’s Specialty Plan.


2. The Authority shall specify the services to be covered in


the request for proposals referenced in paragraph 1 of this


subsection.


3. The contracted entity for the Children’s Specialty Plan


shall coordinate with the dental benefit managers who cover dental


services for its members as provided by subsection C of this


section.


4. Subject to the requirements and approval of the Centers for


Medicare and Medicaid Services, the implementation of the program


shall be no later than April 1, 2024.


E. The Authority shall not implement the transformation of the


Medicaid delivery system until it receives written confirmation from


the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that a managed care

Req. No. 723 Page 4


directed payment program utilizing average commercial rate


methodology for hospital services under the Supplemental Hospital


Offset Payment Program has been approved for Year 1 of the


transformation and will be included in the budget neutrality cap


baseline spending level for purposes of Oklahoma’s 1115 waiver


renewal; provided, however, nothing in this section shall prohibit


the Authority from exploring alternative opportunities with the


Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to maximize the average


commercial rate benefit.


F. 1. Upon receipt of federal approval as described in


paragraph 3 of this subsection, the Authority shall cover


prescription drug services through a fee-for-service delivery model.


The Authority shall transition prescription drug coverage of all


Medicaid members covered by a contracted entity to direct coverage


by the Authority, shall enter into such contracts with pharmacists


and pharmacy providers as are necessary to ensure network adequacy


as required by federal regulation, and shall directly reimburse such


pharmacists and pharmacy providers. The Authority shall amend its


contracts with all contracted entities as necessary to implement the


provisions of this subsection.


2. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit


the Authority from:





Req. No. 723 Page 5


a. implementing value-based payment arrangements with


Medicaid providers through direct contractual


agreements,


b. implementing cost-saving measures for prescription


drug services including, but not limited to,


participation in the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program, or


c. contracting with a pharmacy benefits administrator


that is located in this state to administer claims and


perform other administrative functions on behalf of


the Authority; provided, however, the Authority shall


not contract with a pharmacy benefits manager.


3. The Authority shall seek any federal approval necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 395, O.S.L.


2022, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 448, O.S.L. 2024 (56 O.S.


Supp. 2024, Section 4002.3b), is amended to read as follows:


Section 4002.3b. A. All capitated contracts shall be the


result of requests for proposals issued by the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority and submission of competitive bids by contracted entities


pursuant to the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act.


B. Statewide capitated contracts may be awarded to any


contracted entity including, but not limited to, any provider-led


entity or provider-owned entity, or both.



Req. No. 723 Page 6


C. The Authority shall award no less than three statewide


capitated contracts to provide comprehensive integrated health


services including, but not limited to, medical, and behavioral


health, and pharmacy services and no less than two statewide


capitated contracts to provide dental coverage to Medicaid members


as specified in Section 4002.3a of this title.


D. 1. Except as specified in paragraph 3 of this subsection,


at least one capitated contract to provide statewide coverage to


Medicaid members shall be awarded to a provider-led entity, as long


as the provider-led entity submits a responsive reply to the


Authority’s request for proposals demonstrating ability to fulfill


the contract requirements.


2. Effective with the next procurement cycle, and except as


specified in paragraph 3 of this subsection, at least one capitated


contract to provide statewide coverage to Medicaid members shall be


awarded to a provider-owned entity, as long as the provider-owned


entity submits a responsive reply to the Authority’s request for


proposals demonstrating ability to fulfill the contract


requirements.


3. If no provider-led entity or provider-owned entity submits a


responsive reply to the Authority’s request for proposals


demonstrating ability to fulfill the contract requirements, the


Authority shall not be required to contract for statewide coverage


with a provider-led entity or provider-owned entity.

Req. No. 723 Page 7


4. The Authority shall develop a scoring methodology for the


request for proposals that affords preferential scoring to provider-


led entities and provider-owned entities, as long as the provider-


led entity and provider-owned entity otherwise demonstrate an


ability to fulfill the contract requirements. The preferential


scoring methodology shall include opportunities to award additional


points to provider-led entities and provider-owned entities based on


certain factors including, but not limited to:


a. broad provider participation in ownership and


governance structure,


b. demonstrated experience in care coordination and care


management for Medicaid members across a variety of


service types including, but not limited to, primary


care and behavioral health,


c. demonstrated experience in Medicare or Medicaid


accountable care organizations or other Medicare or


Medicaid alternative payment models, Medicare or


Medicaid value-based payment arrangements, or Medicare


or Medicaid risk-sharing arrangements including, but


not limited to, innovation models of the Center for


Medicare and Medicaid Innovation of the Centers for


Medicare and Medicaid Services, or value-based payment


arrangements or risk-sharing arrangements in the


commercial health care market, and

Req. No. 723 Page 8


d. other relevant factors identified by the Authority.


E. The Authority may select at least one provider-led entity or


one provider-owned entity for the urban region if:


1. The provider-led entity or provider-owned entity submits a


responsive reply to the Authority’s request for proposals


demonstrating ability to fulfill the contract requirements; and


2. The provider-led entity or provider-owned entity


demonstrates the ability, and agrees continually, to expand its


coverage area throughout the contract term and to develop statewide


operational readiness within a time frame set by the Authority but


not mandated before five (5) years.


F. At the discretion of the Authority, capitated contracts may


be extended to ensure there are no gaps in coverage that may result


from termination of a capitated contract; provided, the total


contracting period for a capitated contract shall not exceed seven


(7) years.


G. At the end of the contracting period, the Authority shall


solicit and award new contracts as provided by this section and


Section 4002.3a of this title.


H. At the discretion of the Authority, subject to appropriate


notice to the Legislature and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid


Services, the Authority may approve a delay in the implementation of


one or more capitated contracts to ensure financial and operational


readiness.

Req. No. 723 Page 9


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 4002.5, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 243, O.S.L. 2023 (56 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 4002.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 4002.5. A. A contracted entity shall be responsible


for all administrative functions for members enrolled in its plan


including, but not limited to, claims processing, authorization of


health services, care and case management, grievances and appeals,


and other necessary administrative services.


B. Prior to the execution of a contract between a contracted


entity and the Oklahoma Health Care Authority, the contracted entity


shall obtain the appropriate certificate of authority issued by the


Insurance Department.


1. A contracted entity shall obtain a certificate of authority


issued by the Insurance Department to operate as a health


maintenance organization when the contracted services to be


delivered include physical health services, behavioral health


services, and prescription drug services.


2. A contracted entity shall obtain a certificate of authority


issued by the Insurance Department to operate as an accident and


health insurer or as a prepaid dental plan organization when the


contracted services to be delivered include dental services.


C. 1. To ensure providers have a voice in the direction and


operation of the contracted entities selected by the Oklahoma Health



Req. No. 723 Page 10


Care Authority under Section 4002.3b of this title, each contracted


entity shall have a shared governance structure that includes:


a. representatives of local Oklahoma provider


organizations who are Medicaid providers,


b. essential community providers, and


c. a representative from a teaching hospital owned,


jointly owned, or affiliated with and designated by


the University Hospitals Authority, University


Hospitals Trust, Oklahoma State University Medical


Authority, or Oklahoma State University Medical Trust.


2. No less than one-third (1/3) of the contracted entity’s


local governing body shall be comprised of representatives of local


Oklahoma provider organizations.


3. No less than two members of the contracted entity’s clinical


and quality committees shall be representatives of local Oklahoma


provider organizations, and the committees shall be chaired or co-


chaired by a representative of a local Oklahoma provider


organization.


D. A contracted entity shall promptly notify the Authority of


all material changes affecting the delivery of care or the


administration of its program.


E. A contracted entity shall have a medical loss ratio that


meets the standards provided by 42 C.F.R., Section 438.8.



Req. No. 723 Page 11


F. A contracted entity shall provide patient data to a provider


upon request to the extent allowed under federal or state laws,


rules or regulations including, but not limited to, the Health


Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.


G. A contracted entity or a subcontractor of a contracted


entity shall not enforce a policy or contract term with a provider


that requires the provider to contract for all products that are


currently offered or that may be offered in the future by the


contracted entity or subcontractor.


H. Nothing in this act the Ensuring Access to Medicaid Act or


in a contract between the Authority and a contracted entity shall


prohibit the contracted entity from contracting with a statewide or


regional accountable care organization.


I. Nothing in this act the Ensuring Access to Medicaid Act, in


a contract between the Authority and a contracted entity, or in a


contract between a contracted entity and a provider shall prohibit


any provider from contracting with more than one contracted entity.


J. A contracted entity shall not withhold, fail to offer, or


make impracticable a contract with a provider on the basis of


independent practice or lack of hospital system affiliation.


K. All contracted entities shall:


1. Use the same drug formulary, which shall be established by


the Authority; and



Req. No. 723 Page 12


2. Ensure broad access to pharmacies including, but not limited


to, pharmacies contracted with covered entities under Section 340B


of the Public Health Service Act. Such access shall, at a minimum,


meet the requirements of the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice Act,


Section 6958 et seq. of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


L. Each contracted entity and each participating provider shall


submit data through the state-designated entity for health


information exchange to ensure effective systems and connectivity to


support clinical coordination of care, the exchange of information,


and the availability of data to the Authority to manage the state


Medicaid program.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 4002.12, as


last amended by Section 7, Chapter 448, O.S.L. 2024 (56 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 4002.12), is amended to read as follows:


Section 4002.12. A. Until July 1, 2027, the Oklahoma Health


Care Authority shall establish minimum rates of reimbursement from


contracted entities to providers who elect not to enter into value-


based payment arrangements under subsection B of this section or


other alternative payment agreements for health care items and


services furnished by such providers to enrollees of the state


Medicaid program. Except as provided by subsection I of this


section, until Until July 1, 2027, such reimbursement rates shall be


equal to or greater than:



Req. No. 723 Page 13


1. For an item or service provided by a participating provider


who is in the network of the contracted entity, one hundred percent


(100%) of the reimbursement rate for the applicable service in the


applicable fee schedule of the Authority; or


2. For an item or service provided by a non-participating


provider or a provider who is not in the network of the contracted


entity, ninety percent (90%) of the reimbursement rate for the


applicable service in the applicable fee schedule of the Authority


as of January 1, 2021.


B. A contracted entity shall offer value-based payment


arrangements to all providers in its network capable of entering


into value-based payment arrangements. Such arrangements shall be


optional for the provider but shall be tied to reimbursement


incentives when quality metrics are met. The quality measures used


by a contracted entity to determine reimbursement amounts to


providers in value-based payment arrangements shall align with the


quality measures of the Authority for contracted entities.


C. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the


Authority shall comply with payment methodologies required by


federal law or regulation for specific types of providers including,


but not limited to, Federally Qualified Health Centers, rural health


clinics, pharmacies, Indian Health Care Providers and emergency


services.



Req. No. 723 Page 14


D. A contracted entity shall offer all rural health clinics


(RHCs) contracts that reimburse RHCs using the methodology in place


for each specific RHC prior to January 1, 2023, including any and


all annual rate updates. The contracted entity shall comply with


all federal program rules and requirements, and the transformed


Medicaid delivery system shall not interfere with the program as


designed.


E. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall establish minimum


rates of reimbursement from contracted entities to Certified


Community Behavioral Health Clinic (CCBHC) providers who elect


alternative payment arrangements equal to the prospective payment


system rate under the Medicaid State Plan.


F. The Authority shall establish an incentive payment under the


Supplemental Hospital Offset Payment Program that is determined by


value-based outcomes for providers other than hospitals.


G. Psychologist reimbursement shall reflect outcomes.


Reimbursement shall not be limited to therapy and shall include but


not be limited to testing and assessment.


H. Coverage for Medicaid ground transportation services by


licensed Oklahoma emergency medical services shall be reimbursed at


no less than the published Medicaid rates as set by the Authority.


All currently published Medicaid Healthcare Common Procedure Coding


System (HCPCS) codes paid by the Authority shall continue to be paid


by the contracted entity. The contracted entity shall comply with

Req. No. 723 Page 15


all reimbursement policies established by the Authority for the


ambulance providers. Contracted entities shall accept the modifiers


established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services


currently in use by Medicare at the time of the transport of a


member that is dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid.


I. 1. The rate paid to participating pharmacy providers is


independent of subsection A of this section and shall be the same as


the fee-for-service rate employed by the Authority for the Medicaid


program as stated in the payment methodology in OAC 317:30-5-78,


unless the participating pharmacy provider elects to enter into


other alternative payment agreements.


2. A pharmacy or pharmacist shall receive direct payment or


reimbursement from the Authority or contracted entity when providing


a health care service to the Medicaid member at a rate no less than


that of other health care providers for providing the same service.


J. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,


anesthesia shall continue to be reimbursed equal to or greater than


the anesthesia fee schedule established by the Authority as of


January 1, 2021. Anesthesia providers may also enter into value-


based payment arrangements under this section or alternative payment


arrangements for services furnished to Medicaid members.


K. J. The Authority shall specify in the requests for proposals


a reasonable time frame in which a contracted entity shall have



Req. No. 723 Page 16


entered into a certain percentage, as determined by the Authority,


of value-based contracts with providers.


L. K. Capitation rates established by the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority and paid to contracted entities under capitated contracts


shall be updated annually and in accordance with 42 C.F.R., Section


438.3. Capitation rates shall be approved as actuarially sound as


determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in


accordance with 42 C.F.R., Section 438.4 and the following:


1. Actuarial calculations must include utilization and


expenditure assumptions consistent with industry and local


standards; and


2. Capitation rates shall be risk-adjusted and shall include a


portion that is at risk for achievement of quality and outcomes


measures.


M. L. The Authority may establish a symmetric risk corridor for


contracted entities.


N. M. The Authority shall establish a process for annual


recovery of funds from, or assessment of penalties on, contracted


entities that do not meet the medical loss ratio standards


stipulated in Section 4002.5 of this title.


O. N. 1. The Authority shall, through the financial reporting


required under subsection G of Section 4002.12b of this title,


determine the percentage of health care expenses by each contracted


entity on primary care services.

Req. No. 723 Page 17


2. Not later than the end of the fourth year of the initial


contracting period, each contracted entity shall be currently


spending not less than eleven percent (11%) of its total health care


expenses on primary care services.


3. The Authority shall monitor the primary care spending of


each contracted entity and require each contracted entity to


maintain the level of spending on primary care services stipulated


in paragraph 2 of this subsection.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-723 DC 12/30/2024 5:57:43 PM



























Req. No. 723 Page 18